Utah statutes.
26-18-501.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Certified program" means a nursing care facility program with Medicaid certification.

(2)  "Director" means the director of the Division of Health Care Financing.

(3)  "Medicaid certification" means the right to Medicaid reimbursement as a provider of a nursing care facility program as established by division rule.

(4) (a)  "Nursing care facility" means the following facilities licensed by the department under Chapter 21, Health Care Facility Licensing and Inspection Act:

(i)  skilled nursing homes;

(ii)  intermediate care facilities; and

(iii)  intermediate care facilities for the mentally retarded.

(b)  "Nursing care facility" does not mean a critical access hospital that meets the criteria of 42 U.S.C. 1395i-4(c)(2) (1998).

(5)  "Nursing care facility program" means the personnel, licenses, services, contracts and all other requirements that must be met for a nursing care facility to be eligible for Medicaid certification under this part and division rule.

(6)  "Physical facility" means the buildings or other physical structures where a nursing care facility program is operated.

(7)  "Service area" means the boundaries of the distinct geographic area served by a certified program as determined by the division in accordance with this part and division rule.

